Idaho, session 2026, S1382.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $594,100 $5,157,800 $5,751,900
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 111,500 675,600 787,100
TOTAL $705,600 $5,833,400 $6,539,000
II. ENFORCEMENT:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $59,900 $59,900
III. FISHERIES:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $91,400 $46,000 $167,000 $304,400
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 102,200 7,486,100 7,588,300


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 605,100 4,327,100 950,000 5,882,200
TOTAL $798,700 $11,859,200 $1,117,000 $13,774,900
IV. WILDLIFE:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $121,300 $500,000 $621,300
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 55,200 $500,000 555,200
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 134,600 3,750,000 400,000 4,284,600
TOTAL $311,100 $4,250,000 $900,000 $5,461,100
V. COMMUNICATIONS:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $64,400 $64,400
GRAND TOTAL $1,109,800 $16,879,200 $7,910,300 $25,899,300
SECTION 2. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR DEDICATED FUNDS. There is
hereby reappropriated to the Department of Fish and Game any unexpended and
unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the Department
of Fish and Game from Dedicated Funds for the Administration, Fisheries,
Wildlife, and Communications programs for fiscal year 2026 to be used for
nonrecurring expenditures for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation
amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services
Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR FEDERAL FUNDS. There is
hereby reappropriated to the Department of Fish and Game any unexpended
and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the Depart-
ment of Fish and Game from Federal Funds for the Administration, Fisheries,
Wildlife, and Communications programs for fiscal year 2026, to be used for
nonrecurring expenditures for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation
amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services
Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.


SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.